Connecticut, session 2026, HB05007.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the general statutes be amended to require the state to fully
reimburse each municipality for the revenue loss caused by a property
tax exemption for veterans pursuant to subdivision (83) of section 12-81
of the general statutes.